Illinois, session 104th, HB1758.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Property Control Act is amended by 5changing Section 7.1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 605/7.1)  (from Ch. 127, par. 133b10.1)7    Sec. 7.1. (a) Except as otherwise provided by law, all 8surplus real property held by the State of Illinois shall be 9disposed of by the administrator as provided in this Section. 10"Surplus real property," as used in this Section, means any 11real property to which the State holds fee simple title or 12lesser interest, and is vacant and determined by the head of 13the owning agency to no longer be required for the State 14agency's needs and responsibilities and has no foreseeable use 15by the owning agency. Title to the surplus real property may 16remain with the owning agency throughout the disposition 17process if approved by the Administrator; however, the 18Administrator and the Department of Central Management 19Services shall have sole responsibility and authority for 20disposing of the property as set out in this Section.21    (b) All responsible officers shall submit an Annual Real 22Property Utilization Report to the Administrator, or annual 23update of such report, on forms required by the Administrator,   HB1758 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 06303 BDA 16338 b1by August July 31 of each year. The Administrator may require 2such documentation as he deems reasonably necessary in 3connection with this Report, and shall require that such 4Report include the following information:5        (1) A legal description of all real property owned by 6    the State under the control of the responsible officer.7        (2) A description of the use of the real property 8    listed under (1).9        (3) A list of any improvements made to such real 10    property during the previous year.11        (4) The dates on which the State first acquired its 12    interest in such real property, and the purchase price and 13    source of the funds used to acquire the property.14        (5) Plans for the future use of currently unused real 15    property.16        (6) A declaration of any surplus real property. On or 17    before October 31 of each year the Administrator shall 18    furnish copies of each responsible officer's report along 19    with a list of surplus property indexed by legislative 20    district to the General Assembly.21    This report shall be filed with the Speaker, the Minority 22Leader and the Clerk of the House of Representatives and the 23President, the Minority Leader and the Secretary of the Senate 24and shall be duplicated and made available to the members of 25the General Assembly for evaluation by such members for 26possible liquidation of unused public property at public sale.  HB1758 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 06303 BDA 16338 b1    (c) Following receipt of the Annual Real Property 2Utilization Report required under paragraph (b), the 3Administrator shall notify all State agencies by October 31 of 4all declared surplus real property.5    (d) Any surplus real property shall be disposed of by the 6Administrator. No appraisal is required if during his initial 7survey of surplus real property the Administrator determines 8such property has a fair market value of less than $5,000. If 9the value of such property is determined by the Administrator 10in his initial survey to be $5,000 or more, then the 11Administrator shall obtain 2 appraisals of such real property, 12which shall include known liabilities, including, but not 13limited to, environmental costs. The average of these 2 14appraisals shall represent the fair market value of the 15surplus real property. 16    No surplus real property may be conveyed by the 17Administrator for less than the fair market value, unless the 18Administrator makes a written determination that it is in the 19best interests of the State to establish a different value. 20That written determination shall be published in the Illinois 21Procurement Bulletin. Such written determination, along with 22an affidavit setting forth the conditions and circumstances 23that make the use of a different value in the best interests of 24the State, shall also be filed with the Executive Ethics 25Commission. The Executive Ethics Commission shall have 30 days 26to review the written determination. The Executive Ethics   HB1758 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 06303 BDA 16338 b1Commission may order an additional 30 days to review the 2written determination. The Administrator shall provide the 3Executive Ethics Commission with any information requested by 4the Executive Ethics Commission related to the Administrator's 5determination of the value of the surplus real property. If 6the Executive Ethics Commission objects in writing to the 7value determined by the Administrator, then the Administrator 8shall not convey the surplus real property for less than 9either the fair market value as determined by the average of 10appraisals or an amount agreed upon by the Executive Ethics 11Commission and the Administrator. Circumstances in which it is 12in the best interests of the State to establish a different 13value may include, but are not limited to, the following: (i) 14an auction did not yield any bids at the established fair 15market value; (ii) a unit of local government is interested in 16acquiring the surplus real property; or (iii) the costs to the 17State of maintaining such surplus real property are 18sufficiently high that it would be reasonable to a prudent 19person to sell such surplus real property for less than the 20fair market value established by the average of the 21appraisals. In no event shall the Administrator sell surplus 22real property for less than 75% of fair market value and before 23such property has been offered to an interested unit of local 24government or made available at public auction. 25    Prior to offering the surplus real property for sale to 26the public the Administrator shall give notice in writing of   HB1758 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 06303 BDA 16338 b1the existence of the surplus real property to each State 2agency and to the governing bodies of the county and of all 3cities, villages and incorporated towns in the county in which 4such real property is located. Any such State agency or 5governing body may notify the Administrator of its interest in 6acquiring the surplus real property within a notice period set 7by the Administrator of at least 30 days. If any State agency 8notifies the Administrator of its interest in acquiring the 9surplus property, the Administrator may deny any such requests 10by such agency if the Administrator determines that it is more 11advantageous to the State to dispose of the surplus real 12property to a governing body or the public. If a governing body 13notifies the Administrator of its interest in acquiring the 14property, then the Administrator shall wait a minimum of 30 15additional days during which the Administrator may engage in 16negotiations with such governing body for the sale of the 17surplus real property. After the notice period set by the 18Administrator of at least 30 days has passed, the 19Administrator may sell the surplus real property by public 20auction, which may include an electronic auction or the use of 21sealed bids, following notice of such sale by publication on 3 22separate days not less than 15 nor more than 30 days prior to 23the sale in the State newspaper and in a newspaper having 24general circulation in the county in which the surplus real 25property is located. The Administrator shall post "For Sale" 26signs of a conspicuous nature on such surplus real property   HB1758 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 06303 BDA 16338 b1offered for sale to the public. If no acceptable offers for the 2surplus real property are received, the Administrator may have 3new appraisals of such property made. The Administrator shall 4have all power necessary to convey surplus real property under 5this Section. All moneys received for the sale of surplus real 6property shall be deposited in the General Revenue Fund, 7except that: 8        (1) Where moneys expended for the acquisition of such 9    real property were from a special fund which is still a 10    special fund in the State treasury, this special fund 11    shall be reimbursed in the amount of the original 12    expenditure and any amount in excess thereof shall be 13    deposited in the General Revenue Fund.14        (2) Whenever a State mental health facility operated 15    by the Department of Human Services is closed and the real 16    estate on which the facility is located is sold by the 17    State, the net proceeds of the sale of the real estate 18    shall be deposited into the Community Mental Health 19    Medicaid Trust Fund.20        (3) Whenever a State developmental disabilities 21    facility operated by the Department of Human Services is 22    closed and the real estate on which the facility is 23    located is sold by the State, the net proceeds of the sale 24    of the real estate shall be deposited into the Community 25    Developmental Disability Services Medicaid Trust Fund. 26    The Administrator shall have authority to order such   HB1758 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 06303 BDA 16338 b1surveys, abstracts of title, or commitments for title 2insurance as may, in his reasonable discretion, be deemed 3necessary to demonstrate to prospective purchasers or bidders 4good and marketable title in any property offered for sale 5pursuant to this Section. Unless otherwise specifically 6authorized by the General Assembly, all conveyances of 7property made by the Administrator shall be by quit claim 8deed.9    (e) The Administrator shall submit an annual report on or 10before February 1 to the Governor and the General Assembly 11containing a detailed statement of surplus real property 12either transferred or conveyed under this Section.13(Source: P.A. 102-280, eff. 8-6-21.)